Georgia, session 2025_26, HB794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 SECTION 1.
12 An Act creating the Clayton County Board of Commissioners, approved February 8, 1955
13 (Ga. L. 1955, p. 2064), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 6, 2024 (Ga. L.
14 2024, p. 4178), is amended by revising Section 14.1 as follows:
H. B. 794
- 1 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
15 "SECTION 14.1.
16 (a) Purpose.
17 (1) It is essential to the proper administration and operation of the Clayton County
18 government that its officials and employees be, and give the appearance of being,
19 independent and impartial, that public office not be used for private gain, and that there
20 be public confidence in the integrity of Clayton County officials and employees. Because
21 the attainment of one or more of these ends is impaired whenever there exists in fact, or
22 appears to exist, a conflict between the private interests and public responsibilities of
23 officials and employees, the public interest requires that the General Assembly protect
24 against such conflicts of interest by establishing by law appropriate ethical standards with
25 respect to the conduct of the officials and employees of Clayton County in situations
26 where a conflict may exist.
27 (2) The General Assembly recognizes that an appropriate and effective code of ethics for
28 appointed officials and employees of Clayton County is also essential for the proper
29 administration and operation of the Clayton County government.
30 (b) Definitions. As used in this section, the term:
31 (1) 'Agency' means any board, bureau, body, commission, committee, department, or
32 office of Clayton County to which the board of commissioners has appointment powers.
33 (2) 'Business' means any corporation, partnership, organization, sole proprietorship, other
34 entity operated for economic gain, whether professional, industrial, or commercial, and
35 entity which for purposes of federal income taxation is treated as a nonprofit
36 organization.
37 (3) 'Confidential information' means information which has been obtained in the course
38 of holding public office, employment, acting as an independent contractor, or otherwise
39 acting as an official or employee and which information is not available to members of
H. B. 794
- 2 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
40 the public under state law or other law or regulation and which the official, independent
41 contractor, or employee is not authorized to disclose.
42 (4) 'Contract' means any claim or demand against or any lease, account, or agreement
43 with any person, whether express or implied, executed or executory, verbal or in writing.
44 (5) 'Emergency situation' means any circumstance or condition giving rise to an
45 immediate necessity for the execution of a contract by and between Clayton County and
46 an official or employee or between Clayton County and a business in which an official
47 or employee has an interest and where, to the satisfaction of the board of commissioners,
48 it is shown that there is no one other than such persons with whom the contract could
49 have been made and that the necessity was not brought about by such persons' own fault
50 or neglect.
51 (6) 'Immediate family' means an official or employee and his or her spouse, parents,
52 brothers, sisters, and natural or adopted children.
53 (7) 'Interest' means any direct or indirect pecuniary or material benefit held by or
54 accruing to the official or employee as a result of a contract or transaction which is or
55 may be the subject of an official act or action by or with Clayton County. Unless
56 otherwise provided in this section, the term 'interest' does not include any remote interest.
57 An official or employee shall be deemed to have an interest in transactions involving:
58 (A) Any person in the official's or employee's immediate family;
59 (B) Any person, business, or entity that the official or employee knows or should know
60 is seeking official action with Clayton County, is seeking to do or does business with
61 Clayton County, has interests that may be substantially affected by performance or
62 nonperformance of the official's or employee's official duties, or with whom a
63 contractual relationship exists whereby the official or employee may receive any
64 payment or other benefit;
65 (C) Any business in which the official or employee is a director, officer, employee,
66 shareholder, or consultant; or
H. B. 794
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
67 (D) Any person of whom the official or employee is a creditor, whether secured or
68 unsecured.
69 (8) 'Official or employee' means any person elected or appointed to or employed or
70 retained by Clayton County or any agency, whether paid or unpaid and whether part time
71 or full time. Such term includes retired employees or former county employees during
72 the period of time in which they are later employed or retained by the county or any
73 agency. Such term does not include superior and state court judges and their immediate
74 staffs, the district attorney, the solicitor of the state court, the clerks of the superior and
75 state courts, magistrates, the judge of the probate court, the sheriff, the tax commissioner,
76 and their respective staffs.
77 (9) 'Official act or action' means any legislative, administrative, appointive, or
78 discretionary act of the board of commissioners, the chairperson of the board of
79 commissioners, or a commissioner.
80 (10) 'Paid' means the receipt of, or right to receive, a salary, commission, percentage,
81 brokerage, or contingent fee.
82 (11) 'Participating' means to take part in official acts, actions, or proceedings personally
83 as an official or employee through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation,
84 investigation, the rendering of advice, or the failure to act or perform a duty.
85 (12) 'Person' means any individual, business, labor organization, representative,
86 fiduciary, trust, or association, whether paid or unpaid, and includes any official or
87 employee of Clayton County.
88 (13) 'Property' means any property, whether real or personal or tangible or intangible,
89 and includes currency and commercial paper.
90 (14) 'Remote interest' means the interest of:
91 (A) A nonsalaried director, officer, or employee of a nonprofit organization;
92 (B) A holder of less than 5 percent of the legal or beneficial ownership of the total
93 shares of a business;
H. B. 794
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
94 (C) Any person in a representative capacity, such as a receiver, trustee, or
95 administrator; or
96 (D) Any person who, by determination of the board of ethics, is deemed to have such
97 an interest.
98 (15) 'Transaction' means the conduct of any activity that results in or may result in an
99 official act or action of an official or employee of Clayton County.
100 (c) Proscribed conduct. No official or employee of Clayton County shall:
101 (1) By his or her conduct give reasonable basis for the impression that any person can
102 improperly influence him or her or unduly enjoy his or her favor in the performance of
103 his or her official acts or actions or that he or she is affected unduly by the rank or
104 position of or kinship or association with any person;
105 (2)(A) Directly or indirectly request, exact, receive, or agree to receive a gift, loan,
106 favor, promise, or thing of value for himself or herself or another person if:
107 (i) It tends to influence him or her in the discharge of his or her official duties; or
108 (ii) He or she recently has been, or is now, or in the near future may be, involved in
109 any official act or action directly affecting the donor or lender.
110 (B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply in the case of:
111 (i) An occasional nonpecuniary gift of value less than $100.00;
112 (ii) An award publicly presented in recognition of public service; or
113 (iii) A commercially reasonable loan made in the ordinary course of business by an
114 institution authorized by the laws of Georgia to engage in the making of such a loan;
115 (3) Disclose or otherwise use confidential information acquired by virtue of his or her
116 position for his or her or another person's private gain;
117 (4) Appear on his or her own personal behalf, or represent, advise, or appear on the
118 personal behalf, whether paid or unpaid, of any person before any court or before any
119 legislative, administrative, or quasi-judicial board, agency, commission, or committee of
120 this state or of any county or municipality concerning any contract or transaction which
H. B. 794
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
121 is or may be the subject of an official act or action of Clayton County or otherwise use
122 or attempt to use his or her official position to secure unwarranted privileges or
123 exemptions for himself or herself or other persons;
124 (5) Engage in, accept employment with, or render services for any agency, private
125 business, or professional activity when such employment or rendering of services is
126 adverse to and incompatible with the proper discharge of his or her official duties;
127 (6) Acquire an interest in any contract or transaction at a time when he or she believes
128 or has reason to believe that such an interest will be affected directly or indirectly by his
129 or her official act or actions or by the official acts or actions of other officials or
130 employees of Clayton County; or
131 (7) Engage in any activity or transaction that is prohibited by law now existing or
132 hereafter enacted which is applicable to him or her by virtue of his or her being an official
133 or employee of Clayton County.
134 (d) Gifts to certain employees. No employee of the purchasing department of Clayton
135 County shall accept any gift of value from anyone who has had or may reasonably be
136 anticipated to have any business with or before such department. Gifts from persons who
137 do not have or who would not be reasonably anticipated to have any business with or
138 before such department may be accepted by an employee of such department only when
139 such gifts are based solely on a family relationship or personal friendship.
140 (e) Disclosure of interests. An official or employee who has an interest that he or she has
141 reason to believe may be affected by his or her official acts or actions or by the official acts
142 or actions of another official or employee of Clayton County shall disclose the precise
143 nature and value of such interest by sworn written statement to the board of ethics and ask
144 for the board's opinion as to the propriety of such interest. Every official or employee who
145 knowingly has any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract to which Clayton County is
146 or is about to become a party, or in any other business with Clayton County, shall make full
147 disclosure of such interest to the board of commissioners and to the ethics officer and the
H. B. 794
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
148 board of ethics. The information disclosed by such sworn statements, except for the
149 valuation attributed to the disclosed interest, shall be made a matter of public record by the
150 board of ethics. In cases where a conflict of interest exists, such official or employee shall
151 recuse himself or herself from participating or taking any official acts or actions in any
152 matter for the county affected by such conflict of interest.
153 (f) Participation in contracts.
154 (1) An official or employee shall disqualify himself or herself from participating in any
155 official act or action of Clayton County directly affecting a business or activity in which
156 he or she has any interest, whether or not a remote interest.
157 (2) Clayton County shall not enter into any contract involving services or property with
158 an official or employee of the county or with a business in which an official or employee
159 of the county has an interest. This subsection shall not apply in the case of:
160 (A) The designation of a bank or trust company as a depository for county funds;
161 (B) The borrowing of funds from any bank or lending institution which offers the
162 lowest available rate of interest for such loans;
163 (C) Contracts for services entered into with a business which is the only available
164 source for such goods or services; or
165 (D) Contracts entered into under circumstances which constitute an emergency
166 situation, provided that a record explaining the emergency is prepared by the board of
167 commissioners and submitted to the board of ethics at its next regular meeting and
168 thereafter kept on file.
169 (3) Clayton County shall not enter into any contract with, or take any official act or
170 action favorably affecting, any person, or business represented by such person, who has
171 been within the preceding two-year period an official or employee of Clayton County.
172 (g) Reporting violations.
173 (1) Any person who witnesses or becomes aware of a violation of this section may
174 complain of the violation as follows:
H. B. 794
- 7 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
175 (A) A complaint may be communicated anonymously to the ethics administrator. Such
176 complaint shall be made in good faith and with veracity and sufficient specificity so as
177 to provide the ethics officer with salient and investigable facts. The ethics
178 administrator may require the anonymous complaint to be made in a manner and form
179 that is intended only to obtain relevant facts related to the alleged violation of this
180 section and that is not designed to reveal the identity of the complainant; and
181 (B) A sworn written complaint may be filed with the ethics administrator as described
182 in this subparagraph. All written complaints to be considered by the board of ethics and
183 the ethics officer shall contain the following, if applicable:
184 (i) The name and address of the person or persons filing the complaint;
185 (ii) The sworn verification and signature of the complainant;
186 (iii) The name and address of the party or parties against whom the complaint is filed
187 and, if such party is a candidate, the office being sought;
188 (iv) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the complaint is based along
189 with an allegation that such facts constitute one or more violations of law under the
190 jurisdiction of the board of ethics;
191 (v) A general reference to the allegedly violated statutory provisions of the code of
192 ethics within the jurisdiction of the board of ethics; and
193 (vi) Any further information which might support the allegations in the complaint,
194 including, but not limited to, the following:
195 (I) The names and addresses of all other persons who have first-hand knowledge
196 of the facts alleged in the complaint; and
197 (II) Any documentary evidence that supports the facts alleged in the complaint.
198 (2) Upon receipt of a complaint by the ethics administrator, the ethics administrator shall
199 send a written notice to the subject of the complaint by the next business day. Both this
200 notice and any subsequent documents shall be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of
201 Title 50 of the O.C.G.A.
H. B. 794
- 8 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
202 (3) Upon receipt of a written, nonanonymous complaint which does not conform to the
203 applicable requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
204 ethics administrator shall by letter acknowledge receipt of the complaint and advise the
205 complainant of the defect in the complaint and that the complaint will not be considered
206 by the board of ethics unless the defect is corrected.
207 (h) Enactment.
208 (1) This section shall be construed liberally to effectuate its purpose and policies and to
209 supplement such existing laws as may relate to the conduct of officials or employees.
210 (2) The propriety of any official act or action taken by or transaction involving any
211 officials or employees immediately prior to the time this section shall take effect shall not
212 be affected by the enactment of this section.
213 (3) The provisions of this section are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held
214 unconstitutional or invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of the court
215 shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.
216 (i) Board of ethics.
217 (1)(A) There is created the board of ethics of Clayton County to be composed of eight
218 citizens of Clayton County to be appointed as provided in paragraph (2) of this
219 subsection.
220 (B) Each member of the board of ethics shall have been a resident of Clayton County
221 for at least one year immediately preceding the date of taking office and shall remain
222 a resident of the county, and where applicable the commission district he or she
223 represents, while serving as a member of the board of ethics.
224 (C) No person shall serve as a member of the board of ethics if the person has, or has
225 had within the immediately preceding two-year period, any interest in any contract,
226 transaction, or official act or action of Clayton County.
H. B. 794
- 9 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
227 (D) No member of the board of ethics shall be a member of an agency or an official or
228 employee of Clayton County or shall have served in such a capacity in the two-year
229 period immediately preceding such person's appointment to the board of ethics.
230 (E) No person shall serve as a member of the board of ethics if the person has been a
231 candidate for, or was elected to, public office in the immediately preceding three-year
232 period. Filing for an elective office shall constitute a resignation from the board of
233 ethics on the date of filing.
234 (F) Appointees to the board of ethics shall have professional knowledge or expertise
235 in matters of ethics, finance, governance, or the law.
236 (G)(i) All proposed appointments to the board of ethics shall be subject to an
237 education and employment background check as well as a criminal history check.
238 Persons proposed to be appointed to the board of ethics shall execute all releases
239 necessary for the appointing authority to accomplish such checks.
240 (ii) No person shall serve as a member of the board of ethics if such person has been
241 convicted of a felony.
242 (iii) No person shall serve as a member of the board of ethics if such person has
243 outstanding tax debts.
244 (H) Not later than immediately prior to the time of the appointment or appointments
245 provided for under paragraph (2) of this subsection, each person seeking to be
246 appointed as a member or alternate member of the board of ethics shall file with the
247 clerk of superior court a uniform application form which shall be a public record. The
248 clerk of superior court shall design the form which indicates an applicant's education,
249 employment background, experience, and qualifications for such appointment.
250 (2)(A) The initial board of ethics shall be appointed as provided in this paragraph to take
251 office on September 1, 2025, and to serve for the terms prescribed in this paragraph.
252 (B) Not later than August 1, 2025, the members of the initial board of ethics shall be
253 selected as follows:
H. B. 794
- 10 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
254 (i) Five members shall be appointed by the grand jury of Clayton County, provided
255 that no more than two board members shall reside within the same commission
256 district; and
257 (ii) Three members shall be appointed by the tax commissioner of Clayton County.
258 (C) In addition to the members appointed as provided in subparagraph (B) of this
259 paragraph, there shall be one alternate member who shall serve to ensure a quorum
260 when members of the board are absent, have a conflict of interest, or find it necessary
261 to recuse themselves or while a vacancy exists on the board. The alternate shall be
262 appointed by the tax commissioner of Clayton County.
263 (D) The members and alternate shall each serve for terms of three years; provided,
264 however, that the terms of the initial appointees shall be specified at the time of their
265 appointments as follows:
266 (i) For initial members appointed by the grand jury: Two shall serve until
267 December 31, 2026, and until the appointment and qualification of his or her
268 successor, whichever occurs later; two shall serve until December 31, 2027, and until
269 the appointment and qualification of his or her successor, whichever occurs later; and
270 one shall serve until December 31, 2028, and until the appointment and qualification
271 of his or her successor, whichever occurs later;
272 (ii) For initial members appointed by the tax commissioner: One shall serve until
273 December 31, 2026, and until the appointment and qualification of his or her
274 successor, whichever occurs later; one shall serve until December 31, 2027, and until
275 the appointment and qualification of his or her successor, whichever occurs later; and
276 one shall serve until December 3, 2028, and until the appointment and qualification
277 of his or her successor, whichever occurs later; and
278 (iii) The initial alternate member appointed by the tax commissioner shall serve until
279 December 31, 2028, and until the appointment and qualification of his or her
280 successor, whichever occurs later.
H. B. 794
- 11 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
281 (E) Successors to all members and alternates of the board of ethics and future
282 successors shall be appointed by the respective appointing authorities not less than 30
283 days prior to the expiration of each such member's term of office, and such successors
284 shall take office on January 1 following such appointment and shall serve terms of three
285 years and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. No individual
286 shall be appointed to more than two consecutive terms, provided that the initial terms
287 under this Act shall not be counted in such determination.
288 (F) Members and alternates of the board of ethics shall serve at the pleasure of their
289 respective appointing authorities.
290 (G) The clerk of the Superior Court of Clayton County shall provide administrative
291 assistance to the grand jury regarding the appointment of board members pursuant to
292 this section. Upon a vacancy occurring or the conclusion of the term of a board
293 member appointed pursuant to division (i) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the
294 clerk of the Superior Court of Clayton County shall notify the then sitting grand jury
295 of its duty pursuant to this section.
296 (3) If a member of the board of ethics ceases to be a resident of Clayton County, and
297 where applicable the commission district he or she represents, that member's position on
298 the board of ethics, by operation of law, shall become vacant upon the establishment of
299 the fact of such nonresidency, if contested, by a court of competent jurisdiction. A
300 vacancy in the board of ethics shall exist by reason of death, the disability or incapacity
301 of a member for more than 90 days, resignation, or loss of residency as described in this
302 paragraph. A member of the board of ethics may be removed from office during a term
303 if the member becomes ineligible to hold civil office within the meaning of Code
304 Section 45-2-1 of the O.C.G.A. and that ineligibility is established by decision of a court
305 of competent jurisdiction which declares the office vacant because of such ineligibility
306 or for good cause by a majority vote of the board of ethics. The ethics officer shall notify
307 the clerk of the Superior Court of Clayton County and the tax commissioner of Clayton
H. B. 794
- 12 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
308 County of a vacancy upon its occurrence, and such vacancy shall be filled for the
309 unexpired term by the respective appointing authority.
310 (4)(A) The members of the board of ethics shall serve without compensation and shall
311 elect from their own membership a chairperson and otherwise provide for their own
312 internal organization. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
313 (B) The board of commissioners shall provide adequate office and meeting space and
314 pay all administrative costs, including those specifically stipulated in this paragraph,
315 pertaining to the operation of the board of ethics. The board of commissioners shall
316 provide the board of ethics with administrative and support services of the same level
317 and type as provided to other county departments. The board of ethics shall be
318 authorized to employ its own staff and clerical personnel and contract for the services
319 of a competent court reporter, an attorney, and a private investigator as it deems
320 necessary.
321 (C) The members of the board of ethics shall have the authority to propose the budget
322 of the board and shall recommend the budget to the board of commissioners, who shall
323 fund it as a priority. In the event that the proposed budget is in excess of $200,000.00,
324 the board of commissioners shall have the authority to authorize the additional funds
325 requested in accordance with standard budgetary procedures and requirements. The
326 board of ethics shall be completely independent and shall not be subject to control or
327 supervision by the chairperson of the board of commissioners, the board of
328 commissioners, or any other official, employee, or agency of the county government.
329 The board of ethics shall have the same level of budgetary independence as provided
330 by state law to sheriffs.
331 (D)(i) The board of ethics shall make a return, under oath, to the grand jury of the
332 county on the first day of each term of the superior court. The return shall set forth a
333 just and true statement of the amount of money belonging to the county which was
334 received by the ethics board and the source from which the money was received, along
H. B. 794
- 13 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
335 with the expenditures of the board of ethics, accompanied by a copy of the most recent
336 financial statement or annual audit of the financial affairs of the ethics board.
337 (ii) When a return provided for in division (i) of this subparagraph has been made,
338 the grand jury shall examine such return. If such return is found to be correct, the
339 grand jury shall endorse its approval thereon and attach such endorsement to its
340 general presentments, to be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court. If the
341 return is found to be incorrect, the grand jury, through its foreperson, shall return it
342 to the officer making such return, shall plainly and distinctly set forth in writing the
343 grounds of its disapproval, and shall require the officer to appear before the jury and
344 explain the errors.
345 (iii) Should any officer fail or refuse to make the return required by division (i) of
346 this subparagraph, the foreperson of the grand jury shall immediately notify the
347 presiding judge of such failure. The judge shall issue an order requiring the
348 delinquent officer to come forward and make the return required or, in default thereof,
349 to be attached for contempt.
350 (5) The board of ethics shall have the following duties:
351 (A) To establish procedures, rules, and regulations governing its internal organization
352 and the conduct of its affairs;
353 (B) To render advisory opinions with respect to the interpretation and application of
354 this section to all officials or employees who seek advice as to whether a particular
355 course of conduct would constitute a violation of the standards imposed in this section
356 or other applicable ethical standards. Such opinions shall be binding on the board of
357 ethics in any subsequent complaint concerning the official or employee who sought the
358 opinion and acted in good faith, unless material facts were omitted or misstated in the
359 request for the advisory opinion;
360 (C) To prescribe forms for the disclosures required in this section and to make
361 available to the public the information disclosed as provided in this section;
H. B. 794
- 14 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
362 (D) To receive and hear complaints of violations of the standards required by this
363 section over which it has personal and subject matter jurisdiction;
364 (E) To make such investigations as it deems necessary to determine whether any
365 official or employee has violated or is about to violate any provisions of this section;
366 and
367 (F) To hold such hearings and make such inquiries as it deems necessary for it to carry
368 out properly its functions and powers.
369 (j) Ethics officer.
370 (1) There is hereby created as a position an ethics officer for Clayton County. The ethics
371 officer may be an employee of the county or an independent contractor. The ethics
372 officer must be an active member of the State Bar of Georgia in good standing with five
373 years' experience in the practice of law. The ethics officer shall be appointed by a
374 majority of the members of the board of ethics, subject to confirmation by a majority of
375 the board of commissioners, for a period not to exceed six years. Removal of the ethics
376 officer before the expiration of the designated term shall be for cause by a majority vote
377 of the members of the board of ethics. The ethics officer need not be a resident of the
378 county at the time of his or her appointment, but he or she shall reside in Clayton County
379 within six months of such appointment and continue to reside therein throughout such
380 appointment.
381 (2) The ethics officer shall not be involved in partisan or nonpartisan political activities
382 or the political affairs of Clayton County.
383 (3) The duties of the ethics officer shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
384 (A) Educating and training all county officials and employees to have an awareness
385 and understanding of the mandate for and enforcement of ethical conduct and advising
386 them of the provisions of the code of ethics of Clayton County;
387 (B) Meeting with the board of ethics;
H. B. 794
- 15 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
388 (C) Advising officials and employees regarding disclosure statements and reviewing
389 the same to ensure full and complete financial reporting;
390 (D) Urging compliance with the code of ethics by calling to the attention of the board
391 of ethics any failure to comply or any issues, including the furnishing of false or
392 misleading information, that the ethics officer believes should be investigated by the
393 board of ethics so that the board of ethics may take such action as it deems appropriate;
394 (E) Monitoring, evaluating, and acting upon information obtained from an ethics
395 hotline, which shall be a county telephone number for the receipt of information about
396 ethical violations. Each complaint, as of the time it is reported, whether by telephone
397 or otherwise, shall be deemed to be a separate pending investigation of a complaint
398 against a public officer or employee as provided by Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50
399 of the O.C.G.A.;
400 (F) Reporting, as appropriate, suspected ethical violations to the board of ethics;
401 (G) Reporting, as appropriate, suspected criminal violations to state or federal law
402 enforcement agencies; and
403 (H) Filing with the board of ethics and the board of commissioners on the first Tuesday
404 of each February a written report describing the activities of the ethics officer in
405 carrying out the goals of his or her office and the code of ethics and reporting on the
406 ethical health of Clayton County.
407 (k) Ethics administrator.
408 (1) There is hereby created as a position an ethics administrator for Clayton County. The
409 ethics administrator shall be selected by the board of ethics and shall serve at the pleasure
410 of the board. The ethics administrator may be an employee of the county or as an
411 independent contractor.
412 (2) The ethics administrator shall not be involved in partisan or nonpartisan political
413 activities or the political affairs of Clayton County.
H. B. 794
- 16 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
414 (3) The duties of the ethics administrator shall include, but not be limited to, the
415 following:
416 (A) Maintaining the records of the board of ethics as required by Article 4 of
417 Chapter 18 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A.;
418 (B) Notifying the subject of a report of any alleged violation of the ethics code,
419 whether the report is anonymous, made by an identified individual, or written. Such
420 notice shall be given in writing to the subject of the complaint at the same time and in
421 the same form that any disclosure of information is required by Article 4 of Chapter 18
422 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A.;
423 (C) Notifying the board of ethics of any report of an alleged violation of the ethics code
424 received by the ethics administrator; and
425 (D) Such other duties as may be assigned by the board of ethics.
426 (l) Investigations and hearings.
427 (1) The board of ethics shall conduct investigations into alleged violations of the code
428 of ethics, hold hearings, and issue decisions as prescribed in this subsection.
429 (2) The proceedings and records of the board of ethics shall be open unless otherwise
430 permitted by state law.
431 (3) A complaint may be filed by the ethics officer, any resident, or a group of residents
432 of Clayton County by submitting to the ethics administrator a written, verified, and sworn
433 complaint under the penalty of perjury or false swearing. The complaint shall specifically
434 identify all provisions of the Clayton County code of ethics which the subject of the
435 complaint is alleged to have violated, set forth facts as would be admissible in evidence
436 in a court proceeding, and show affirmatively that the complainant or affiant, if in
437 addition to or different from the complainant, is competent to testify to the matter set
438 forth therein. All documents referenced in the complaint as well as supporting affidavits
439 shall be attached to the complaint.
H. B. 794
- 17 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
440 (4) Upon receipt of the complaint, the ethics administrator shall bring the complaint
441 before the board of ethics which shall cause the ethics officer to conduct a preliminary
442 investigation to determine whether it meets the jurisdictional requirements as set forth in
443 this section. Upon the conclusion of the preliminary investigation, the ethics officer shall
444 report his or her findings to the board. If, in the opinion of the board, the complaint fails
445 to meet the jurisdictional requirements as set forth in this section, the board shall direct
446 the ethics officer to notify the person who filed the complaint and such person shall have
447 ten days from the date of notice to correct and refile the complaint with the board. A
448 complaint which fails to satisfy the jurisdictional requirements as established by this
449 section and by the rules and procedures established by the board of ethics shall be
450 dismissed by the board of ethics no later than 30 days after the complaint is filed with the
451 ethics administrator, unless extended by a majority vote of the board of ethics.
452 (5) The ethics officer will report his or her findings and recommendation to the board of
453 ethics and advise whether there is probable cause for belief that the code of ethics has
454 been violated, warranting a formal hearing. If the board of ethics determines, after the
455 preliminary investigation of a complaint by the ethics officer, that there does not exist
456 probable cause for belief that this section has been violated, the board of ethics shall so
457 notify the complainant and the subject of the investigation, and the complaint will be
458 dismissed. If the board of ethics determines, after a preliminary investigation of the
459 complaint by the ethics officer, that there does exist probable cause for belief that this
460 section has been violated, the board of ethics shall give notice to the person involved to
461 attend a hearing to determine whether there has been a violation of this section.
462 (6) For use in proceedings under this section, the board of ethics shall have the power to
463 issue subpoenas to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or produce
464 documentary or other evidence. Any person who fails to respond to such subpoenas may
465 be subjected to the penalties set forth in subsection (m) of this section.
466 (7) All hearings of the board of ethics pursuant to this section shall be as follows:
H. B. 794
- 18 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
467 (A) All testimony shall be under oath, which shall be administered by a member of the
468 board of ethics. Any person who appears before the board of ethics shall have all of the
469 due process rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a witness appearing before the
470 courts of this state. Any person whose name is mentioned during a proceeding of the
471 board of ethics and who may be adversely affected thereby may appear personally
472 before the board of ethics on such person's own behalf or may file a written sworn
473 statement for incorporation into the record to be made part of all proceedings pursuant
474 to this subsection;
475 (B) The decision of the board of ethics shall be governed by a preponderance of the
476 evidence standard;
477 (C) All hearings held by the board of ethics shall be conducted in accordance with the
478 rules of evidence set forth in Title 24 of the O.C.G.A.; and
479 (D) At the conclusion of proceedings concerning an alleged violation, the board of
480 ethics shall immediately begin deliberations on the evidence and proceed to determine
481 by a majority vote of members present whether there has been a violation of this
482 section. The findings of the board of ethics concerning a violation and the record of the
483 proceedings shall be made public by the ethics officer as soon as practicable after the
484 determination has been made.
485 (m) Violations; appeals.
486 (1) Any intentional violation of this section, furnishing of false or misleading
487 information to the board of ethics or the ethics officer, failure to follow an opinion
488 rendered by the board of ethics, or failure to comply with a subpoena issued by the board
489 of ethics pursuant to this section shall subject the violator to any one or more of the
490 following:
491 (A) Administrative sanction of not more than $1,000.00 assessed by the board of
492 ethics;
493 (B) Public reprimand by the board of ethics; and
H. B. 794
- 19 -

25 LC 47 3355/AP
494 (C) The board of ethics shall refer any potential criminal activity to an appropriate law
495 enforcement officer.
496 (2) With regard to violations by persons other than officials or employees, in addition to
497 the remedies in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the board of ethics may recommend to
498 the board of commissioners any one or more of the following:
499 (A) Suspension of a contractor; and
500 (B) Disqualification or debarment from contracting or subcontracting with Clayton
501 County.
502 (3) The decision of the board of ethics after a hearing shall be final; provided, however,
503 that such proceeding shall be subject to review by filing a petition for review in the
504 superior court. The proceedings on the petition for review shall be governed by
505 Chapter 3 of Title 5 of the O.C.G.A. The designee of the board of ethics shall be
506 authorized to acknowledge service of any such petition for review and shall, within the
507 time provided by law, certify and cause to be filed with the clerk of the superior court a
508 record of the proceedings before the board of ethics, the decision of the board of ethics,
509 and the notice of the final actions of the board of ethics."
510 SECTION 2.
511 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 794
- 20 -